Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB609.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "eligible recipient" means a certified teacher, certified
media specialist, reading intervention teacher, or other specialized literacy
instructional support personnel:
(a) Who is employed in a local public school district or a public charter school;
and
(b) Whose job duties include teaching reading skills to students in kindergarten
through grade five (5).
(2) The Classroom Library Grant Program is hereby established to provide science of
reading curriculum-aligned books and materials in elementary school
classrooms. The Classroom Library Grant Program shall operate under the
oversight of the Kentucky Department of Education pursuant to this section.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education shall select a provider to administer the
Classroom Library Grant Program under the department's oversight. In
evaluating program administrator applicants, the department shall require an
applicant to demonstrate experience operating a charitable, project-based
platform that:
(a) Enables public school teachers to request classroom materials and
instructional resources;
(b) Reviews requests for compliance with established grant recipient eligibility
criteria;
(c) Provides item-level reporting of supplies and materials provided;
(d) Provides necessary audit documentation; and
(e) Delivers approved materials directly to schools or classrooms.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2026 12:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1894
(4) The selected administrator shall:
(a) Notify eligible recipients of funding availability for Classroom Library
Grant Program awards and the process to submit request applications;
(b) Review award applications for compliance with established eligibility
criteria;
(c) Make awards available to applicants who are eligible recipients teaching
reading skills to students in the following descending order of priorities,
with access to funds for each proceeding priority group subject to total
funding availability:
1. Kindergarten through grade three (3) in a school with more than forty
percent (40%) of students eligible for the federal free and reduced-
price lunch program;
2. Kindergarten through grade three (3) not included in subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph;
3. Grade four (4) through grade five (5) in a school with more than forty
percent (40%) of students eligible for the federal free and reduced-
price lunch program; and
4. Grade four (4) through grade five (5) not included in subparagraph 3.
of this paragraph;
(d) As funds are available for eligible recipients in each priority group, provide
eligible recipients with an award of books and other literacy materials:
1. In an equivalent amount up to five hundred dollars ($500) per award
cycle;
2. That are aligned with the science of reading curriculum appropriate
for the student population served by the eligible recipient; and
3. Consistent with the request of the eligible recipient in the application.
(e) Explore and pursue opportunities to supplement provided funds with gifts
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2026 12:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1894
or donations from individuals, private organizations, or foundations;
(f) Permit eligible recipients to request support in excess of the limit in
paragraph (d) of this subsection, provided that the administrator may fulfill
the request only by utilizing nonpublic funds; and
(g) Submit a report to the Kentucky Department of Education by January 15,
2028, and each January 15 thereafter until no funds remain, including the
number of eligible recipients awarded grants, the role of each eligible
recipient, the student population served by each eligible recipient, an item-
level reporting of supplies and materials provided, and a summary of the
geographic distribution of eligible recipients awarded grants.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Learning and Results Services budget unit
under the Kentucky Department of Education for the purpose of implementation of the
Classroom Library Grant Program established in Section 1 of this Act. Notwithstanding
KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2026 12:41 PM Jacketed